Utah statutes.
11-45-205.   Approval of loan by board.

(1)  In approving a loan, the board shall:

(a)  review the loan application, plans, and specifications for the project;

(b)  determine whether or not to grant the loan by applying its eligibility criteria; and

(c)  if the loan is granted, prioritize the energy efficiency project by applying its priority criteria.

(2)  The board may provide conditions on a loan to ensure that:

(a)  the proceeds of the loan will be used to pay the cost of the project; and

(b)  the project will be completed.

